Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-2157
Substandard and blighted area; extremely blighted area; designation for more than thirty years; analysis of redevelopment projects; when; applicability.

(1) Beginning January 1, 2026, if an area has been designated as a substandard and blighted area under section 18-2109 or an extremely blighted area under section 18-2101.02 for more than thirty years, the governing body of the city shall not approve a new redevelopment plan or redevelopment project within such area unless and until the city conducts an analysis of the redevelopment projects that have occurred within such area. The analysis shall, at a minimum, include an assessment of the factors contributing to the lack of redevelopment in those parts of the area where significant redevelopment has not occurred and goals for the future redevelopment of the area. The analysis shall be provided to the planning commission or board of the city and to the governing body of the city. A copy of such analysis shall be made available for public inspection at a location designated by the city.

(2) This section does not apply to the downtown area of a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village. For purposes of this section, downtown area means the urban core of population density and concentrated commercial activity.

Laws 2023, LB531, § 19.